Illinois, session 104th, HB1331.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Network Adequacy and Transparency Act is 5amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 124/10)7    (Text of Section from P.A. 103-650)8    Sec. 10. Network adequacy.9    (a) Before issuing, delivering, or renewing a network 10plan, an issuer providing a network plan shall file a 11description of all of the following with the Director:12        (1) The written policies and procedures for adding 13    providers to meet patient needs based on increases in the 14    number of beneficiaries, changes in the 15    patient-to-provider ratio, changes in medical and health 16    care capabilities, and increased demand for services.17        (2) The written policies and procedures for making 18    referrals within and outside the network.19        (3) The written policies and procedures on how the 20    network plan will provide 24-hour, 7-day per week access 21    to network-affiliated primary care, emergency services, 22    and women's principal health care providers.23    An issuer shall not prohibit a preferred provider from   HB1331 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1discussing any specific or all treatment options with 2beneficiaries irrespective of the insurer's position on those 3treatment options or from advocating on behalf of 4beneficiaries within the utilization review, grievance, or 5appeals processes established by the issuer in accordance with 6any rights or remedies available under applicable State or 7federal law.8    (b) Before issuing, delivering, or renewing a network 9plan, an issuer must file for review a description of the 10services to be offered through a network plan. The description 11shall include all of the following:12        (1) A geographic map of the area proposed to be served 13    by the plan by county service area and zip code, including 14    marked locations for preferred providers.15        (2) As deemed necessary by the Department, the names, 16    addresses, phone numbers, and specialties of the providers 17    who have entered into preferred provider agreements under 18    the network plan.19        (3) The number of beneficiaries anticipated to be 20    covered by the network plan.21        (4) An Internet website and toll-free telephone number 22    for beneficiaries and prospective beneficiaries to access 23    current and accurate lists of preferred providers in each 24    plan, additional information about the plan, as well as 25    any other information required by Department rule.26        (5) A description of how health care services to be   HB1331 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    rendered under the network plan are reasonably accessible 2    and available to beneficiaries. The description shall 3    address all of the following:4            (A) the type of health care services to be 5        provided by the network plan;6            (B) the ratio of physicians and other providers to 7        beneficiaries, by specialty and including primary care 8        physicians and facility-based physicians when 9        applicable under the contract, necessary to meet the 10        health care needs and service demands of the currently 11        enrolled population; 12            (C) the travel and distance standards for plan 13        beneficiaries in county service areas; and14            (D) a description of how the use of telemedicine, 15        telehealth, or mobile care services may be used to 16        partially meet the network adequacy standards, if 17        applicable.18        (6) A provision ensuring that whenever a beneficiary 19    has made a good faith effort, as evidenced by accessing 20    the provider directory, calling the network plan, and 21    calling the provider, to utilize preferred providers for a 22    covered service and it is determined the insurer does not 23    have the appropriate preferred providers due to 24    insufficient number, type, unreasonable travel distance or 25    delay, or preferred providers refusing to provide a 26    covered service because it is contrary to the conscience   HB1331 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    of the preferred providers, as protected by the Health 2    Care Right of Conscience Act, the issuer shall ensure, 3    directly or indirectly, by terms contained in the payer 4    contract, that the beneficiary will be provided the 5    covered service at no greater cost to the beneficiary than 6    if the service had been provided by a preferred provider. 7    This paragraph (6) does not apply to: (A) a beneficiary 8    who willfully chooses to access a non-preferred provider 9    for health care services available through the panel of 10    preferred providers, or (B) a beneficiary enrolled in a 11    health maintenance organization. In these circumstances, 12    the contractual requirements for non-preferred provider 13    reimbursements shall apply unless Section 356z.3a of the 14    Illinois Insurance Code requires otherwise. In no event 15    shall a beneficiary who receives care at a participating 16    health care facility be required to search for 17    participating providers under the circumstances described 18    in subsection (b) or (b-5) of Section 356z.3a of the 19    Illinois Insurance Code except under the circumstances 20    described in paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5).21        (7) A provision that the beneficiary shall receive 22    emergency care coverage such that payment for this 23    coverage is not dependent upon whether the emergency 24    services are performed by a preferred or non-preferred 25    provider and the coverage shall be at the same benefit 26    level as if the service or treatment had been rendered by a   HB1331 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    preferred provider. For purposes of this paragraph (7), 2    "the same benefit level" means that the beneficiary is 3    provided the covered service at no greater cost to the 4    beneficiary than if the service had been provided by a 5    preferred provider. This provision shall be consistent 6    with Section 356z.3a of the Illinois Insurance Code.7        (8) A limitation that, if the plan provides that the 8    beneficiary will incur a penalty for failing to 9    pre-certify inpatient hospital treatment, the penalty may 10    not exceed $1,000 per occurrence in addition to the plan 11    cost sharing provisions.12        (9) For a network plan to be offered through the 13    Exchange in the individual or small group market, as well 14    as any off-Exchange mirror of such a network plan, 15    evidence that the network plan includes essential 16    community providers in accordance with rules established 17    by the Exchange that will operate in this State for the 18    applicable plan year. 19    (c) The issuer shall demonstrate to the Director a minimum 20ratio of providers to plan beneficiaries as required by the 21Department for each network plan.22        (1) The minimum ratio of physicians or other providers 23    to plan beneficiaries shall be established by the 24    Department in consultation with the Department of Public 25    Health based upon the guidance from the federal Centers 26    for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The Department shall   HB1331 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    not establish ratios for vision or dental providers who 2    provide services under dental-specific or vision-specific 3    benefits, except to the extent provided under federal law 4    for stand-alone dental plans. The Department shall 5    consider establishing ratios for the following physicians 6    or other providers:7            (A) Primary Care;8            (B) Pediatrics;9            (C) Cardiology;10            (D) Gastroenterology;11            (E) General Surgery;12            (F) Neurology;13            (G) OB/GYN;14            (H) Oncology/Radiation;15            (I) Ophthalmology;16            (J) Urology;17            (K) Behavioral Health;18            (L) Allergy/Immunology;19            (M) Chiropractic;20            (N) Dermatology;21            (O) Endocrinology;22            (P) Ears, Nose, and Throat (ENT)/Otolaryngology;23            (Q) Infectious Disease;24            (R) Nephrology;25            (S) Neurosurgery;26            (T) Orthopedic Surgery;  HB1331 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1            (U) Physiatry/Rehabilitative;2            (V) Plastic Surgery;3            (W) Pulmonary;4            (X) Rheumatology;5            (Y) Anesthesiology;6            (Z) Pain Medicine;7            (AA) Pediatric Specialty Services;8            (BB) Outpatient Dialysis; and9            (CC) HIV; and .10            (DD) Genetic Medicine and Genetic Counseling. 11        (2) The Director shall establish a process for the 12    review of the adequacy of these standards, along with an 13    assessment of additional specialties to be included in the 14    list under this subsection (c).15        (3) Notwithstanding any other law or rule, the minimum 16    ratio for each provider type shall be no less than any such 17    ratio established for qualified health plans in 18    Federally-Facilitated Exchanges by federal law or by the 19    federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, even 20    if the network plan is issued in the large group market or 21    is otherwise not issued through an exchange. Federal 22    standards for stand-alone dental plans shall only apply to 23    such network plans. In the absence of an applicable 24    Department rule, the federal standards shall apply for the 25    time period specified in the federal law, regulation, or 26    guidance. If the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid   HB1331 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    Services establish standards that are more stringent than 2    the standards in effect under any Department rule, the 3    Department may amend its rules to conform to the more 4    stringent federal standards. 5    (d) The network plan shall demonstrate to the Director 6maximum travel and distance standards and appointment wait 7time standards for plan beneficiaries, which shall be 8established by the Department in consultation with the 9Department of Public Health based upon the guidance from the 10federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. These 11standards shall consist of the maximum minutes or miles to be 12traveled by a plan beneficiary for each county type, such as 13large counties, metro counties, or rural counties as defined 14by Department rule.15    The maximum travel time and distance standards must 16include standards for each physician and other provider 17category listed for which ratios have been established.18    The Director shall establish a process for the review of 19the adequacy of these standards along with an assessment of 20additional specialties to be included in the list under this 21subsection (d).22    Notwithstanding any other law or Department rule, the 23maximum travel time and distance standards and appointment 24wait time standards shall be no greater than any such 25standards established for qualified health plans in 26Federally-Facilitated Exchanges by federal law or by the   HB1331 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, even if 2the network plan is issued in the large group market or is 3otherwise not issued through an exchange. Federal standards 4for stand-alone dental plans shall only apply to such network 5plans. In the absence of an applicable Department rule, the 6federal standards shall apply for the time period specified in 7the federal law, regulation, or guidance. If the Centers for 8Medicare and Medicaid Services establish standards that are 9more stringent than the standards in effect under any 10Department rule, the Department may amend its rules to conform 11to the more stringent federal standards. 12    If the federal area designations for the maximum time or 13distance or appointment wait time standards required are 14changed by the most recent Letter to Issuers in the 15Federally-facilitated Marketplaces, the Department shall post 16on its website notice of such changes and may amend its rules 17to conform to those designations if the Director deems 18appropriate. 19    (d-5)(1) Every issuer shall ensure that beneficiaries have 20timely and proximate access to treatment for mental, 21emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions 22in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (4) of 23subsection (a) of Section 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. 24Issuers shall use a comparable process, strategy, evidentiary 25standard, and other factors in the development and application 26of the network adequacy standards for timely and proximate   HB1331 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1access to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or 2substance use disorders or conditions and those for the access 3to treatment for medical and surgical conditions. As such, the 4network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access 5shall equally be applied to treatment facilities and providers 6for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 7conditions and specialists providing medical or surgical 8benefits pursuant to the parity requirements of Section 370c.1 9of the Illinois Insurance Code and the federal Paul Wellstone 10and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity 11Act of 2008. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the network 12adequacy standards for timely and proximate access to 13treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 14disorders or conditions shall, at a minimum, satisfy the 15following requirements:16        (A) For beneficiaries residing in the metropolitan 17    counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, and Will, 18    network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access 19    to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance 20    use disorders or conditions means a beneficiary shall not 21    have to travel longer than 30 minutes or 30 miles from the 22    beneficiary's residence to receive outpatient treatment 23    for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders 24    or conditions. Beneficiaries shall not be required to wait 25    longer than 10 business days between requesting an initial 26    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of   HB1331 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 2    conditions for outpatient treatment or to wait longer than 3    20 business days between requesting a repeat or follow-up 4    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of 5    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 6    conditions for outpatient treatment; however, subject to 7    the protections of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a 8    network plan shall not be held responsible if the 9    beneficiary or provider voluntarily chooses to schedule an 10    appointment outside of these required time frames.11        (B) For beneficiaries residing in Illinois counties 12    other than those counties listed in subparagraph (A) of 13    this paragraph, network adequacy standards for timely and 14    proximate access to treatment for mental, emotional, 15    nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions means a 16    beneficiary shall not have to travel longer than 60 17    minutes or 60 miles from the beneficiary's residence to 18    receive outpatient treatment for mental, emotional, 19    nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions. 20    Beneficiaries shall not be required to wait longer than 10 21    business days between requesting an initial appointment 22    and being seen by the facility or provider of mental, 23    emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 24    conditions for outpatient treatment or to wait longer than 25    20 business days between requesting a repeat or follow-up 26    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of   HB1331 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 2    conditions for outpatient treatment; however, subject to 3    the protections of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a 4    network plan shall not be held responsible if the 5    beneficiary or provider voluntarily chooses to schedule an 6    appointment outside of these required time frames.7    (2) For beneficiaries residing in all Illinois counties, 8network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access to 9treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 10disorders or conditions means a beneficiary shall not have to 11travel longer than 60 minutes or 60 miles from the 12beneficiary's residence to receive inpatient or residential 13treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 14disorders or conditions.15    (3) If there is no in-network facility or provider 16available for a beneficiary to receive timely and proximate 17access to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or 18substance use disorders or conditions in accordance with the 19network adequacy standards outlined in this subsection, the 20issuer shall provide necessary exceptions to its network to 21ensure admission and treatment with a provider or at a 22treatment facility in accordance with the network adequacy 23standards in this subsection. 24    (4) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 25Services establishes or law requires more stringent standards 26for qualified health plans in the Federally-Facilitated   HB1331 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1Exchanges, the federal standards shall control for all network 2plans for the time period specified in the federal law, 3regulation, or guidance, even if the network plan is issued in 4the large group market, is issued through a different type of 5Exchange, or is otherwise not issued through an Exchange. 6    (e) Except for network plans solely offered as a group 7health plan, these ratio and time and distance standards apply 8to the lowest cost-sharing tier of any tiered network.9    (f) The network plan may consider use of other health care 10service delivery options, such as telemedicine or telehealth, 11mobile clinics, and centers of excellence, or other ways of 12delivering care to partially meet the requirements set under 13this Section.14    (g) Except for the requirements set forth in subsection 15(d-5), issuers who are not able to comply with the provider 16ratios and time and distance or appointment wait time 17standards established under this Act or federal law may 18request an exception to these requirements from the 19Department. The Department may grant an exception in the 20following circumstances:21        (1) if no providers or facilities meet the specific 22    time and distance standard in a specific service area and 23    the issuer (i) discloses information on the distance and 24    travel time points that beneficiaries would have to travel 25    beyond the required criterion to reach the next closest 26    contracted provider outside of the service area and (ii)   HB1331 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    provides contact information, including names, addresses, 2    and phone numbers for the next closest contracted provider 3    or facility;4        (2) if patterns of care in the service area do not 5    support the need for the requested number of provider or 6    facility type and the issuer provides data on local 7    patterns of care, such as claims data, referral patterns, 8    or local provider interviews, indicating where the 9    beneficiaries currently seek this type of care or where 10    the physicians currently refer beneficiaries, or both; or11        (3) other circumstances deemed appropriate by the 12    Department consistent with the requirements of this Act.13    (h) Issuers are required to report to the Director any 14material change to an approved network plan within 15 business 15days after the change occurs and any change that would result 16in failure to meet the requirements of this Act. The issuer 17shall submit a revised version of the portions of the network 18adequacy filing affected by the material change, as determined 19by the Director by rule, and the issuer shall attach versions 20with the changes indicated for each document that was revised 21from the previous version of the filing. Upon notice from the 22issuer, the Director shall reevaluate the network plan's 23compliance with the network adequacy and transparency 24standards of this Act. For every day past 15 business days that 25the issuer fails to submit a revised network adequacy filing 26to the Director, the Director may order a fine of $5,000 per   HB1331 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1day. 2    (i) If a network plan is inadequate under this Act with 3respect to a provider type in a county, and if the network plan 4does not have an approved exception for that provider type in 5that county pursuant to subsection (g), an issuer shall cover 6out-of-network claims for covered health care services 7received from that provider type within that county at the 8in-network benefit level and shall retroactively adjudicate 9and reimburse beneficiaries to achieve that objective if their 10claims were processed at the out-of-network level contrary to 11this subsection. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed 12to supersede Section 356z.3a of the Illinois Insurance Code. 13    (j) If the Director determines that a network is 14inadequate in any county and no exception has been granted 15under subsection (g) and the issuer does not have a process in 16place to comply with subsection (d-5), the Director may 17prohibit the network plan from being issued or renewed within 18that county until the Director determines that the network is 19adequate apart from processes and exceptions described in 20subsections (d-5) and (g). Nothing in this subsection shall be 21construed to terminate any beneficiary's health insurance 22coverage under a network plan before the expiration of the 23beneficiary's policy period if the Director makes a 24determination under this subsection after the issuance or 25renewal of the beneficiary's policy or certificate because of 26a material change. Policies or certificates issued or renewed   HB1331 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1in violation of this subsection may subject the issuer to a 2civil penalty of $5,000 per policy. 3    (k) For the Department to enforce any new or modified 4federal standard before the Department adopts the standard by 5rule, the Department must, no later than May 15 before the 6start of the plan year, give public notice to the affected 7health insurance issuers through a bulletin. 8(Source: P.A. 102-144, eff. 1-1-22; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 9102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-650, eff. 1-1-25.) 10    (Text of Section from P.A. 103-656)11    Sec. 10. Network adequacy.12    (a) An insurer providing a network plan shall file a 13description of all of the following with the Director:14        (1) The written policies and procedures for adding 15    providers to meet patient needs based on increases in the 16    number of beneficiaries, changes in the 17    patient-to-provider ratio, changes in medical and health 18    care capabilities, and increased demand for services.19        (2) The written policies and procedures for making 20    referrals within and outside the network.21        (3) The written policies and procedures on how the 22    network plan will provide 24-hour, 7-day per week access 23    to network-affiliated primary care, emergency services, 24    and women's principal health care providers.25    An insurer shall not prohibit a preferred provider from   HB1331 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1discussing any specific or all treatment options with 2beneficiaries irrespective of the insurer's position on those 3treatment options or from advocating on behalf of 4beneficiaries within the utilization review, grievance, or 5appeals processes established by the insurer in accordance 6with any rights or remedies available under applicable State 7or federal law.8    (b) Insurers must file for review a description of the 9services to be offered through a network plan. The description 10shall include all of the following:11        (1) A geographic map of the area proposed to be served 12    by the plan by county service area and zip code, including 13    marked locations for preferred providers.14        (2) As deemed necessary by the Department, the names, 15    addresses, phone numbers, and specialties of the providers 16    who have entered into preferred provider agreements under 17    the network plan.18        (3) The number of beneficiaries anticipated to be 19    covered by the network plan.20        (4) An Internet website and toll-free telephone number 21    for beneficiaries and prospective beneficiaries to access 22    current and accurate lists of preferred providers, 23    additional information about the plan, as well as any 24    other information required by Department rule.25        (5) A description of how health care services to be 26    rendered under the network plan are reasonably accessible   HB1331 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    and available to beneficiaries. The description shall 2    address all of the following:3            (A) the type of health care services to be 4        provided by the network plan;5            (B) the ratio of physicians and other providers to 6        beneficiaries, by specialty and including primary care 7        physicians and facility-based physicians when 8        applicable under the contract, necessary to meet the 9        health care needs and service demands of the currently 10        enrolled population; 11            (C) the travel and distance standards for plan 12        beneficiaries in county service areas; and13            (D) a description of how the use of telemedicine, 14        telehealth, or mobile care services may be used to 15        partially meet the network adequacy standards, if 16        applicable.17        (6) A provision ensuring that whenever a beneficiary 18    has made a good faith effort, as evidenced by accessing 19    the provider directory, calling the network plan, and 20    calling the provider, to utilize preferred providers for a 21    covered service and it is determined the insurer does not 22    have the appropriate preferred providers due to 23    insufficient number, type, unreasonable travel distance or 24    delay, or preferred providers refusing to provide a 25    covered service because it is contrary to the conscience 26    of the preferred providers, as protected by the Health   HB1331 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    Care Right of Conscience Act, the insurer shall ensure, 2    directly or indirectly, by terms contained in the payer 3    contract, that the beneficiary will be provided the 4    covered service at no greater cost to the beneficiary than 5    if the service had been provided by a preferred provider. 6    This paragraph (6) does not apply to: (A) a beneficiary 7    who willfully chooses to access a non-preferred provider 8    for health care services available through the panel of 9    preferred providers, or (B) a beneficiary enrolled in a 10    health maintenance organization. In these circumstances, 11    the contractual requirements for non-preferred provider 12    reimbursements shall apply unless Section 356z.3a of the 13    Illinois Insurance Code requires otherwise. In no event 14    shall a beneficiary who receives care at a participating 15    health care facility be required to search for 16    participating providers under the circumstances described 17    in subsection (b) or (b-5) of Section 356z.3a of the 18    Illinois Insurance Code except under the circumstances 19    described in paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5).20        (7) A provision that the beneficiary shall receive 21    emergency care coverage such that payment for this 22    coverage is not dependent upon whether the emergency 23    services are performed by a preferred or non-preferred 24    provider and the coverage shall be at the same benefit 25    level as if the service or treatment had been rendered by a 26    preferred provider. For purposes of this paragraph (7),   HB1331 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    "the same benefit level" means that the beneficiary is 2    provided the covered service at no greater cost to the 3    beneficiary than if the service had been provided by a 4    preferred provider. This provision shall be consistent 5    with Section 356z.3a of the Illinois Insurance Code.6        (8) A limitation that complies with subsections (d) 7    and (e) of Section 55 of the Prior Authorization Reform 8    Act.9    (c) The network plan shall demonstrate to the Director a 10minimum ratio of providers to plan beneficiaries as required 11by the Department.12        (1) The ratio of physicians or other providers to plan 13    beneficiaries shall be established annually by the 14    Department in consultation with the Department of Public 15    Health based upon the guidance from the federal Centers 16    for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The Department shall 17    not establish ratios for vision or dental providers who 18    provide services under dental-specific or vision-specific 19    benefits. The Department shall consider establishing 20    ratios for the following physicians or other providers:21            (A) Primary Care;22            (B) Pediatrics;23            (C) Cardiology;24            (D) Gastroenterology;25            (E) General Surgery;26            (F) Neurology;  HB1331 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1            (G) OB/GYN;2            (H) Oncology/Radiation;3            (I) Ophthalmology;4            (J) Urology;5            (K) Behavioral Health;6            (L) Allergy/Immunology;7            (M) Chiropractic;8            (N) Dermatology;9            (O) Endocrinology;10            (P) Ears, Nose, and Throat (ENT)/Otolaryngology;11            (Q) Infectious Disease;12            (R) Nephrology;13            (S) Neurosurgery;14            (T) Orthopedic Surgery;15            (U) Physiatry/Rehabilitative;16            (V) Plastic Surgery;17            (W) Pulmonary;18            (X) Rheumatology;19            (Y) Anesthesiology;20            (Z) Pain Medicine;21            (AA) Pediatric Specialty Services;22            (BB) Outpatient Dialysis; and23            (CC) HIV; and .24            (DD) Genetic Medicine and Genetic Counseling. 25        (2) The Director shall establish a process for the 26    review of the adequacy of these standards, along with an   HB1331 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    assessment of additional specialties to be included in the 2    list under this subsection (c).3    (d) The network plan shall demonstrate to the Director 4maximum travel and distance standards for plan beneficiaries, 5which shall be established annually by the Department in 6consultation with the Department of Public Health based upon 7the guidance from the federal Centers for Medicare and 8Medicaid Services. These standards shall consist of the 9maximum minutes or miles to be traveled by a plan beneficiary 10for each county type, such as large counties, metro counties, 11or rural counties as defined by Department rule.12    The maximum travel time and distance standards must 13include standards for each physician and other provider 14category listed for which ratios have been established.15    The Director shall establish a process for the review of 16the adequacy of these standards along with an assessment of 17additional specialties to be included in the list under this 18subsection (d).19    (d-5)(1) Every insurer shall ensure that beneficiaries 20have timely and proximate access to treatment for mental, 21emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions 22in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (4) of 23subsection (a) of Section 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. 24Insurers shall use a comparable process, strategy, evidentiary 25standard, and other factors in the development and application 26of the network adequacy standards for timely and proximate   HB1331 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1access to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or 2substance use disorders or conditions and those for the access 3to treatment for medical and surgical conditions. As such, the 4network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access 5shall equally be applied to treatment facilities and providers 6for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 7conditions and specialists providing medical or surgical 8benefits pursuant to the parity requirements of Section 370c.1 9of the Illinois Insurance Code and the federal Paul Wellstone 10and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity 11Act of 2008. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the network 12adequacy standards for timely and proximate access to 13treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 14disorders or conditions shall, at a minimum, satisfy the 15following requirements:16        (A) For beneficiaries residing in the metropolitan 17    counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, and Will, 18    network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access 19    to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance 20    use disorders or conditions means a beneficiary shall not 21    have to travel longer than 30 minutes or 30 miles from the 22    beneficiary's residence to receive outpatient treatment 23    for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders 24    or conditions. Beneficiaries shall not be required to wait 25    longer than 10 business days between requesting an initial 26    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of   HB1331 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 2    conditions for outpatient treatment or to wait longer than 3    20 business days between requesting a repeat or follow-up 4    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of 5    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 6    conditions for outpatient treatment; however, subject to 7    the protections of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a 8    network plan shall not be held responsible if the 9    beneficiary or provider voluntarily chooses to schedule an 10    appointment outside of these required time frames.11        (B) For beneficiaries residing in Illinois counties 12    other than those counties listed in subparagraph (A) of 13    this paragraph, network adequacy standards for timely and 14    proximate access to treatment for mental, emotional, 15    nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions means a 16    beneficiary shall not have to travel longer than 60 17    minutes or 60 miles from the beneficiary's residence to 18    receive outpatient treatment for mental, emotional, 19    nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions. 20    Beneficiaries shall not be required to wait longer than 10 21    business days between requesting an initial appointment 22    and being seen by the facility or provider of mental, 23    emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 24    conditions for outpatient treatment or to wait longer than 25    20 business days between requesting a repeat or follow-up 26    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of   HB1331 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 2    conditions for outpatient treatment; however, subject to 3    the protections of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a 4    network plan shall not be held responsible if the 5    beneficiary or provider voluntarily chooses to schedule an 6    appointment outside of these required time frames.7    (2) For beneficiaries residing in all Illinois counties, 8network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access to 9treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 10disorders or conditions means a beneficiary shall not have to 11travel longer than 60 minutes or 60 miles from the 12beneficiary's residence to receive inpatient or residential 13treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 14disorders or conditions.15    (3) If there is no in-network facility or provider 16available for a beneficiary to receive timely and proximate 17access to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or 18substance use disorders or conditions in accordance with the 19network adequacy standards outlined in this subsection, the 20insurer shall provide necessary exceptions to its network to 21ensure admission and treatment with a provider or at a 22treatment facility in accordance with the network adequacy 23standards in this subsection. 24    (e) Except for network plans solely offered as a group 25health plan, these ratio and time and distance standards apply 26to the lowest cost-sharing tier of any tiered network.  HB1331 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    (f) The network plan may consider use of other health care 2service delivery options, such as telemedicine or telehealth, 3mobile clinics, and centers of excellence, or other ways of 4delivering care to partially meet the requirements set under 5this Section.6    (g) Except for the requirements set forth in subsection 7(d-5), insurers who are not able to comply with the provider 8ratios and time and distance standards established by the 9Department may request an exception to these requirements from 10the Department. The Department may grant an exception in the 11following circumstances:12        (1) if no providers or facilities meet the specific 13    time and distance standard in a specific service area and 14    the insurer (i) discloses information on the distance and 15    travel time points that beneficiaries would have to travel 16    beyond the required criterion to reach the next closest 17    contracted provider outside of the service area and (ii) 18    provides contact information, including names, addresses, 19    and phone numbers for the next closest contracted provider 20    or facility;21        (2) if patterns of care in the service area do not 22    support the need for the requested number of provider or 23    facility type and the insurer provides data on local 24    patterns of care, such as claims data, referral patterns, 25    or local provider interviews, indicating where the 26    beneficiaries currently seek this type of care or where   HB1331 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    the physicians currently refer beneficiaries, or both; or2        (3) other circumstances deemed appropriate by the 3    Department consistent with the requirements of this Act.4    (h) Insurers are required to report to the Director any 5material change to an approved network plan within 15 days 6after the change occurs and any change that would result in 7failure to meet the requirements of this Act. Upon notice from 8the insurer, the Director shall reevaluate the network plan's 9compliance with the network adequacy and transparency 10standards of this Act.11(Source: P.A. 102-144, eff. 1-1-22; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 12102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25.) 13    (Text of Section from P.A. 103-718)14    Sec. 10. Network adequacy.15    (a) An insurer providing a network plan shall file a 16description of all of the following with the Director:17        (1) The written policies and procedures for adding 18    providers to meet patient needs based on increases in the 19    number of beneficiaries, changes in the 20    patient-to-provider ratio, changes in medical and health 21    care capabilities, and increased demand for services.22        (2) The written policies and procedures for making 23    referrals within and outside the network.24        (3) The written policies and procedures on how the 25    network plan will provide 24-hour, 7-day per week access   HB1331 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    to network-affiliated primary care, emergency services, 2    and obstetrical and gynecological health care 3    professionals.4    An insurer shall not prohibit a preferred provider from 5discussing any specific or all treatment options with 6beneficiaries irrespective of the insurer's position on those 7treatment options or from advocating on behalf of 8beneficiaries within the utilization review, grievance, or 9appeals processes established by the insurer in accordance 10with any rights or remedies available under applicable State 11or federal law.12    (b) Insurers must file for review a description of the 13services to be offered through a network plan. The description 14shall include all of the following:15        (1) A geographic map of the area proposed to be served 16    by the plan by county service area and zip code, including 17    marked locations for preferred providers.18        (2) As deemed necessary by the Department, the names, 19    addresses, phone numbers, and specialties of the providers 20    who have entered into preferred provider agreements under 21    the network plan.22        (3) The number of beneficiaries anticipated to be 23    covered by the network plan.24        (4) An Internet website and toll-free telephone number 25    for beneficiaries and prospective beneficiaries to access 26    current and accurate lists of preferred providers,   HB1331 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    additional information about the plan, as well as any 2    other information required by Department rule.3        (5) A description of how health care services to be 4    rendered under the network plan are reasonably accessible 5    and available to beneficiaries. The description shall 6    address all of the following:7            (A) the type of health care services to be 8        provided by the network plan;9            (B) the ratio of physicians and other providers to 10        beneficiaries, by specialty and including primary care 11        physicians and facility-based physicians when 12        applicable under the contract, necessary to meet the 13        health care needs and service demands of the currently 14        enrolled population; 15            (C) the travel and distance standards for plan 16        beneficiaries in county service areas; and17            (D) a description of how the use of telemedicine, 18        telehealth, or mobile care services may be used to 19        partially meet the network adequacy standards, if 20        applicable.21        (6) A provision ensuring that whenever a beneficiary 22    has made a good faith effort, as evidenced by accessing 23    the provider directory, calling the network plan, and 24    calling the provider, to utilize preferred providers for a 25    covered service and it is determined the insurer does not 26    have the appropriate preferred providers due to   HB1331 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    insufficient number, type, unreasonable travel distance or 2    delay, or preferred providers refusing to provide a 3    covered service because it is contrary to the conscience 4    of the preferred providers, as protected by the Health 5    Care Right of Conscience Act, the insurer shall ensure, 6    directly or indirectly, by terms contained in the payer 7    contract, that the beneficiary will be provided the 8    covered service at no greater cost to the beneficiary than 9    if the service had been provided by a preferred provider. 10    This paragraph (6) does not apply to: (A) a beneficiary 11    who willfully chooses to access a non-preferred provider 12    for health care services available through the panel of 13    preferred providers, or (B) a beneficiary enrolled in a 14    health maintenance organization. In these circumstances, 15    the contractual requirements for non-preferred provider 16    reimbursements shall apply unless Section 356z.3a of the 17    Illinois Insurance Code requires otherwise. In no event 18    shall a beneficiary who receives care at a participating 19    health care facility be required to search for 20    participating providers under the circumstances described 21    in subsection (b) or (b-5) of Section 356z.3a of the 22    Illinois Insurance Code except under the circumstances 23    described in paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5).24        (7) A provision that the beneficiary shall receive 25    emergency care coverage such that payment for this 26    coverage is not dependent upon whether the emergency   HB1331 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    services are performed by a preferred or non-preferred 2    provider and the coverage shall be at the same benefit 3    level as if the service or treatment had been rendered by a 4    preferred provider. For purposes of this paragraph (7), 5    "the same benefit level" means that the beneficiary is 6    provided the covered service at no greater cost to the 7    beneficiary than if the service had been provided by a 8    preferred provider. This provision shall be consistent 9    with Section 356z.3a of the Illinois Insurance Code.10        (8) A limitation that, if the plan provides that the 11    beneficiary will incur a penalty for failing to 12    pre-certify inpatient hospital treatment, the penalty may 13    not exceed $1,000 per occurrence in addition to the plan 14    cost-sharing provisions.15    (c) The network plan shall demonstrate to the Director a 16minimum ratio of providers to plan beneficiaries as required 17by the Department.18        (1) The ratio of physicians or other providers to plan 19    beneficiaries shall be established annually by the 20    Department in consultation with the Department of Public 21    Health based upon the guidance from the federal Centers 22    for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The Department shall 23    not establish ratios for vision or dental providers who 24    provide services under dental-specific or vision-specific 25    benefits. The Department shall consider establishing 26    ratios for the following physicians or other providers:  HB1331 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1            (A) Primary Care;2            (B) Pediatrics;3            (C) Cardiology;4            (D) Gastroenterology;5            (E) General Surgery;6            (F) Neurology;7            (G) OB/GYN;8            (H) Oncology/Radiation;9            (I) Ophthalmology;10            (J) Urology;11            (K) Behavioral Health;12            (L) Allergy/Immunology;13            (M) Chiropractic;14            (N) Dermatology;15            (O) Endocrinology;16            (P) Ears, Nose, and Throat (ENT)/Otolaryngology;17            (Q) Infectious Disease;18            (R) Nephrology;19            (S) Neurosurgery;20            (T) Orthopedic Surgery;21            (U) Physiatry/Rehabilitative;22            (V) Plastic Surgery;23            (W) Pulmonary;24            (X) Rheumatology;25            (Y) Anesthesiology;26            (Z) Pain Medicine;  HB1331 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1            (AA) Pediatric Specialty Services;2            (BB) Outpatient Dialysis; and3            (CC) HIV; and .4            (DD) Genetic Medicine and Genetic Counseling. 5        (2) The Director shall establish a process for the 6    review of the adequacy of these standards, along with an 7    assessment of additional specialties to be included in the 8    list under this subsection (c).9    (d) The network plan shall demonstrate to the Director 10maximum travel and distance standards for plan beneficiaries, 11which shall be established annually by the Department in 12consultation with the Department of Public Health based upon 13the guidance from the federal Centers for Medicare and 14Medicaid Services. These standards shall consist of the 15maximum minutes or miles to be traveled by a plan beneficiary 16for each county type, such as large counties, metro counties, 17or rural counties as defined by Department rule.18    The maximum travel time and distance standards must 19include standards for each physician and other provider 20category listed for which ratios have been established.21    The Director shall establish a process for the review of 22the adequacy of these standards along with an assessment of 23additional specialties to be included in the list under this 24subsection (d).25    (d-5)(1) Every insurer shall ensure that beneficiaries 26have timely and proximate access to treatment for mental,   HB1331 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions 2in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (4) of 3subsection (a) of Section 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. 4Insurers shall use a comparable process, strategy, evidentiary 5standard, and other factors in the development and application 6of the network adequacy standards for timely and proximate 7access to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or 8substance use disorders or conditions and those for the access 9to treatment for medical and surgical conditions. As such, the 10network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access 11shall equally be applied to treatment facilities and providers 12for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 13conditions and specialists providing medical or surgical 14benefits pursuant to the parity requirements of Section 370c.1 15of the Illinois Insurance Code and the federal Paul Wellstone 16and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity 17Act of 2008. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the network 18adequacy standards for timely and proximate access to 19treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 20disorders or conditions shall, at a minimum, satisfy the 21following requirements:22        (A) For beneficiaries residing in the metropolitan 23    counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, and Will, 24    network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access 25    to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance 26    use disorders or conditions means a beneficiary shall not   HB1331 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    have to travel longer than 30 minutes or 30 miles from the 2    beneficiary's residence to receive outpatient treatment 3    for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders 4    or conditions. Beneficiaries shall not be required to wait 5    longer than 10 business days between requesting an initial 6    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of 7    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 8    conditions for outpatient treatment or to wait longer than 9    20 business days between requesting a repeat or follow-up 10    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of 11    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 12    conditions for outpatient treatment; however, subject to 13    the protections of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a 14    network plan shall not be held responsible if the 15    beneficiary or provider voluntarily chooses to schedule an 16    appointment outside of these required time frames.17        (B) For beneficiaries residing in Illinois counties 18    other than those counties listed in subparagraph (A) of 19    this paragraph, network adequacy standards for timely and 20    proximate access to treatment for mental, emotional, 21    nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions means a 22    beneficiary shall not have to travel longer than 60 23    minutes or 60 miles from the beneficiary's residence to 24    receive outpatient treatment for mental, emotional, 25    nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions. 26    Beneficiaries shall not be required to wait longer than 10   HB1331 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    business days between requesting an initial appointment 2    and being seen by the facility or provider of mental, 3    emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 4    conditions for outpatient treatment or to wait longer than 5    20 business days between requesting a repeat or follow-up 6    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of 7    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 8    conditions for outpatient treatment; however, subject to 9    the protections of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a 10    network plan shall not be held responsible if the 11    beneficiary or provider voluntarily chooses to schedule an 12    appointment outside of these required time frames.13    (2) For beneficiaries residing in all Illinois counties, 14network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access to 15treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 16disorders or conditions means a beneficiary shall not have to 17travel longer than 60 minutes or 60 miles from the 18beneficiary's residence to receive inpatient or residential 19treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 20disorders or conditions.21    (3) If there is no in-network facility or provider 22available for a beneficiary to receive timely and proximate 23access to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or 24substance use disorders or conditions in accordance with the 25network adequacy standards outlined in this subsection, the 26insurer shall provide necessary exceptions to its network to   HB1331 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1ensure admission and treatment with a provider or at a 2treatment facility in accordance with the network adequacy 3standards in this subsection. 4    (e) Except for network plans solely offered as a group 5health plan, these ratio and time and distance standards apply 6to the lowest cost-sharing tier of any tiered network.7    (f) The network plan may consider use of other health care 8service delivery options, such as telemedicine or telehealth, 9mobile clinics, and centers of excellence, or other ways of 10delivering care to partially meet the requirements set under 11this Section.12    (g) Except for the requirements set forth in subsection 13(d-5), insurers who are not able to comply with the provider 14ratios and time and distance standards established by the 15Department may request an exception to these requirements from 16the Department. The Department may grant an exception in the 17following circumstances:18        (1) if no providers or facilities meet the specific 19    time and distance standard in a specific service area and 20    the insurer (i) discloses information on the distance and 21    travel time points that beneficiaries would have to travel 22    beyond the required criterion to reach the next closest 23    contracted provider outside of the service area and (ii) 24    provides contact information, including names, addresses, 25    and phone numbers for the next closest contracted provider 26    or facility;  HB1331 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1        (2) if patterns of care in the service area do not 2    support the need for the requested number of provider or 3    facility type and the insurer provides data on local 4    patterns of care, such as claims data, referral patterns, 5    or local provider interviews, indicating where the 6    beneficiaries currently seek this type of care or where 7    the physicians currently refer beneficiaries, or both; or8        (3) other circumstances deemed appropriate by the 9    Department consistent with the requirements of this Act.10    (h) Insurers are required to report to the Director any 11material change to an approved network plan within 15 days 12after the change occurs and any change that would result in 13failure to meet the requirements of this Act. Upon notice from 14the insurer, the Director shall reevaluate the network plan's 15compliance with the network adequacy and transparency 16standards of this Act.17(Source: P.A. 102-144, eff. 1-1-22; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 18102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24.) 19    (Text of Section from P.A. 103-777)20    Sec. 10. Network adequacy.21    (a) An insurer providing a network plan shall file a 22description of all of the following with the Director:23        (1) The written policies and procedures for adding 24    providers to meet patient needs based on increases in the 25    number of beneficiaries, changes in the   HB1331 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    patient-to-provider ratio, changes in medical and health 2    care capabilities, and increased demand for services.3        (2) The written policies and procedures for making 4    referrals within and outside the network.5        (3) The written policies and procedures on how the 6    network plan will provide 24-hour, 7-day per week access 7    to network-affiliated primary care, emergency services, 8    and women's principal health care providers.9    An insurer shall not prohibit a preferred provider from 10discussing any specific or all treatment options with 11beneficiaries irrespective of the insurer's position on those 12treatment options or from advocating on behalf of 13beneficiaries within the utilization review, grievance, or 14appeals processes established by the insurer in accordance 15with any rights or remedies available under applicable State 16or federal law.17    (b) Insurers must file for review a description of the 18services to be offered through a network plan. The description 19shall include all of the following:20        (1) A geographic map of the area proposed to be served 21    by the plan by county service area and zip code, including 22    marked locations for preferred providers.23        (2) As deemed necessary by the Department, the names, 24    addresses, phone numbers, and specialties of the providers 25    who have entered into preferred provider agreements under 26    the network plan.  HB1331 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1        (3) The number of beneficiaries anticipated to be 2    covered by the network plan.3        (4) An Internet website and toll-free telephone number 4    for beneficiaries and prospective beneficiaries to access 5    current and accurate lists of preferred providers, 6    additional information about the plan, as well as any 7    other information required by Department rule.8        (5) A description of how health care services to be 9    rendered under the network plan are reasonably accessible 10    and available to beneficiaries. The description shall 11    address all of the following:12            (A) the type of health care services to be 13        provided by the network plan;14            (B) the ratio of physicians and other providers to 15        beneficiaries, by specialty and including primary care 16        physicians and facility-based physicians when 17        applicable under the contract, necessary to meet the 18        health care needs and service demands of the currently 19        enrolled population; 20            (C) the travel and distance standards for plan 21        beneficiaries in county service areas; and22            (D) a description of how the use of telemedicine, 23        telehealth, or mobile care services may be used to 24        partially meet the network adequacy standards, if 25        applicable.26        (6) A provision ensuring that whenever a beneficiary   HB1331 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    has made a good faith effort, as evidenced by accessing 2    the provider directory, calling the network plan, and 3    calling the provider, to utilize preferred providers for a 4    covered service and it is determined the insurer does not 5    have the appropriate preferred providers due to 6    insufficient number, type, unreasonable travel distance or 7    delay, or preferred providers refusing to provide a 8    covered service because it is contrary to the conscience 9    of the preferred providers, as protected by the Health 10    Care Right of Conscience Act, the insurer shall ensure, 11    directly or indirectly, by terms contained in the payer 12    contract, that the beneficiary will be provided the 13    covered service at no greater cost to the beneficiary than 14    if the service had been provided by a preferred provider. 15    This paragraph (6) does not apply to: (A) a beneficiary 16    who willfully chooses to access a non-preferred provider 17    for health care services available through the panel of 18    preferred providers, or (B) a beneficiary enrolled in a 19    health maintenance organization. In these circumstances, 20    the contractual requirements for non-preferred provider 21    reimbursements shall apply unless Section 356z.3a of the 22    Illinois Insurance Code requires otherwise. In no event 23    shall a beneficiary who receives care at a participating 24    health care facility be required to search for 25    participating providers under the circumstances described 26    in subsection (b) or (b-5) of Section 356z.3a of the   HB1331 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    Illinois Insurance Code except under the circumstances 2    described in paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5).3        (7) A provision that the beneficiary shall receive 4    emergency care coverage such that payment for this 5    coverage is not dependent upon whether the emergency 6    services are performed by a preferred or non-preferred 7    provider and the coverage shall be at the same benefit 8    level as if the service or treatment had been rendered by a 9    preferred provider. For purposes of this paragraph (7), 10    "the same benefit level" means that the beneficiary is 11    provided the covered service at no greater cost to the 12    beneficiary than if the service had been provided by a 13    preferred provider. This provision shall be consistent 14    with Section 356z.3a of the Illinois Insurance Code.15        (8) A limitation that, if the plan provides that the 16    beneficiary will incur a penalty for failing to 17    pre-certify inpatient hospital treatment, the penalty may 18    not exceed $1,000 per occurrence in addition to the plan 19    cost sharing provisions.20    (c) The network plan shall demonstrate to the Director a 21minimum ratio of providers to plan beneficiaries as required 22by the Department.23        (1) The ratio of physicians or other providers to plan 24    beneficiaries shall be established annually by the 25    Department in consultation with the Department of Public 26    Health based upon the guidance from the federal Centers   HB1331 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The Department shall 2    not establish ratios for vision or dental providers who 3    provide services under dental-specific or vision-specific 4    benefits, except to the extent provided under federal law 5    for stand-alone dental plans. The Department shall 6    consider establishing ratios for the following physicians 7    or other providers:8            (A) Primary Care;9            (B) Pediatrics;10            (C) Cardiology;11            (D) Gastroenterology;12            (E) General Surgery;13            (F) Neurology;14            (G) OB/GYN;15            (H) Oncology/Radiation;16            (I) Ophthalmology;17            (J) Urology;18            (K) Behavioral Health;19            (L) Allergy/Immunology;20            (M) Chiropractic;21            (N) Dermatology;22            (O) Endocrinology;23            (P) Ears, Nose, and Throat (ENT)/Otolaryngology;24            (Q) Infectious Disease;25            (R) Nephrology;26            (S) Neurosurgery;  HB1331 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1            (T) Orthopedic Surgery;2            (U) Physiatry/Rehabilitative;3            (V) Plastic Surgery;4            (W) Pulmonary;5            (X) Rheumatology;6            (Y) Anesthesiology;7            (Z) Pain Medicine;8            (AA) Pediatric Specialty Services;9            (BB) Outpatient Dialysis; and10            (CC) HIV; and .11            (DD) Genetic Medicine and Genetic Counseling. 12        (2) The Director shall establish a process for the 13    review of the adequacy of these standards, along with an 14    assessment of additional specialties to be included in the 15    list under this subsection (c).16        (3) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 17    Services establishes minimum provider ratios for 18    stand-alone dental plans in the type of exchange in use in 19    this State for a given plan year, the Department shall 20    enforce those standards for stand-alone dental plans for 21    that plan year. 22    (d) The network plan shall demonstrate to the Director 23maximum travel and distance standards for plan beneficiaries, 24which shall be established annually by the Department in 25consultation with the Department of Public Health based upon 26the guidance from the federal Centers for Medicare and   HB1331 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1Medicaid Services. These standards shall consist of the 2maximum minutes or miles to be traveled by a plan beneficiary 3for each county type, such as large counties, metro counties, 4or rural counties as defined by Department rule.5    The maximum travel time and distance standards must 6include standards for each physician and other provider 7category listed for which ratios have been established.8    The Director shall establish a process for the review of 9the adequacy of these standards along with an assessment of 10additional specialties to be included in the list under this 11subsection (d).12    If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services 13establishes appointment wait-time standards for qualified 14health plans, including stand-alone dental plans, in the type 15of exchange in use in this State for a given plan year, the 16Department shall enforce those standards for the same types of 17qualified health plans for that plan year. If the federal 18Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services establishes time 19and distance standards for stand-alone dental plans in the 20type of exchange in use in this State for a given plan year, 21the Department shall enforce those standards for stand-alone 22dental plans for that plan year. 23    (d-5)(1) Every insurer shall ensure that beneficiaries 24have timely and proximate access to treatment for mental, 25emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions 26in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (4) of   HB1331 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1subsection (a) of Section 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. 2Insurers shall use a comparable process, strategy, evidentiary 3standard, and other factors in the development and application 4of the network adequacy standards for timely and proximate 5access to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or 6substance use disorders or conditions and those for the access 7to treatment for medical and surgical conditions. As such, the 8network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access 9shall equally be applied to treatment facilities and providers 10for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 11conditions and specialists providing medical or surgical 12benefits pursuant to the parity requirements of Section 370c.1 13of the Illinois Insurance Code and the federal Paul Wellstone 14and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity 15Act of 2008. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the network 16adequacy standards for timely and proximate access to 17treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 18disorders or conditions shall, at a minimum, satisfy the 19following requirements:20        (A) For beneficiaries residing in the metropolitan 21    counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, and Will, 22    network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access 23    to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance 24    use disorders or conditions means a beneficiary shall not 25    have to travel longer than 30 minutes or 30 miles from the 26    beneficiary's residence to receive outpatient treatment   HB1331 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders 2    or conditions. Beneficiaries shall not be required to wait 3    longer than 10 business days between requesting an initial 4    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of 5    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 6    conditions for outpatient treatment or to wait longer than 7    20 business days between requesting a repeat or follow-up 8    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of 9    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 10    conditions for outpatient treatment; however, subject to 11    the protections of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a 12    network plan shall not be held responsible if the 13    beneficiary or provider voluntarily chooses to schedule an 14    appointment outside of these required time frames.15        (B) For beneficiaries residing in Illinois counties 16    other than those counties listed in subparagraph (A) of 17    this paragraph, network adequacy standards for timely and 18    proximate access to treatment for mental, emotional, 19    nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions means a 20    beneficiary shall not have to travel longer than 60 21    minutes or 60 miles from the beneficiary's residence to 22    receive outpatient treatment for mental, emotional, 23    nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions. 24    Beneficiaries shall not be required to wait longer than 10 25    business days between requesting an initial appointment 26    and being seen by the facility or provider of mental,   HB1331 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 2    conditions for outpatient treatment or to wait longer than 3    20 business days between requesting a repeat or follow-up 4    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of 5    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 6    conditions for outpatient treatment; however, subject to 7    the protections of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a 8    network plan shall not be held responsible if the 9    beneficiary or provider voluntarily chooses to schedule an 10    appointment outside of these required time frames.11    (2) For beneficiaries residing in all Illinois counties, 12network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access to 13treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 14disorders or conditions means a beneficiary shall not have to 15travel longer than 60 minutes or 60 miles from the 16beneficiary's residence to receive inpatient or residential 17treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 18disorders or conditions.19    (3) If there is no in-network facility or provider 20available for a beneficiary to receive timely and proximate 21access to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or 22substance use disorders or conditions in accordance with the 23network adequacy standards outlined in this subsection, the 24insurer shall provide necessary exceptions to its network to 25ensure admission and treatment with a provider or at a 26treatment facility in accordance with the network adequacy   HB1331 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1standards in this subsection. 2    (4) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 3Services establishes a more stringent standard in any county 4than specified in paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection 5(d-5) for qualified health plans in the type of exchange in use 6in this State for a given plan year, the federal standard shall 7apply in lieu of the standard in paragraph (1) or (2) of this 8subsection (d-5) for qualified health plans for that plan 9year. 10    (e) Except for network plans solely offered as a group 11health plan, these ratio and time and distance standards apply 12to the lowest cost-sharing tier of any tiered network.13    (f) The network plan may consider use of other health care 14service delivery options, such as telemedicine or telehealth, 15mobile clinics, and centers of excellence, or other ways of 16delivering care to partially meet the requirements set under 17this Section.18    (g) Except for the requirements set forth in subsection 19(d-5), insurers who are not able to comply with the provider 20ratios, time and distance standards, and appointment wait-time 21standards established under this Act or federal law may 22request an exception to these requirements from the 23Department. The Department may grant an exception in the 24following circumstances:25        (1) if no providers or facilities meet the specific 26    time and distance standard in a specific service area and   HB1331 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    the insurer (i) discloses information on the distance and 2    travel time points that beneficiaries would have to travel 3    beyond the required criterion to reach the next closest 4    contracted provider outside of the service area and (ii) 5    provides contact information, including names, addresses, 6    and phone numbers for the next closest contracted provider 7    or facility;8        (2) if patterns of care in the service area do not 9    support the need for the requested number of provider or 10    facility type and the insurer provides data on local 11    patterns of care, such as claims data, referral patterns, 12    or local provider interviews, indicating where the 13    beneficiaries currently seek this type of care or where 14    the physicians currently refer beneficiaries, or both; or15        (3) other circumstances deemed appropriate by the 16    Department consistent with the requirements of this Act.17    (h) Insurers are required to report to the Director any 18material change to an approved network plan within 15 days 19after the change occurs and any change that would result in 20failure to meet the requirements of this Act. Upon notice from 21the insurer, the Director shall reevaluate the network plan's 22compliance with the network adequacy and transparency 23standards of this Act.24(Source: P.A. 102-144, eff. 1-1-22; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 25102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-777, eff. 1-1-25.)   HB1331 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    (Text of Section from P.A. 103-906)2    Sec. 10. Network adequacy.3    (a) An insurer providing a network plan shall file a 4description of all of the following with the Director:5        (1) The written policies and procedures for adding 6    providers to meet patient needs based on increases in the 7    number of beneficiaries, changes in the 8    patient-to-provider ratio, changes in medical and health 9    care capabilities, and increased demand for services.10        (2) The written policies and procedures for making 11    referrals within and outside the network.12        (3) The written policies and procedures on how the 13    network plan will provide 24-hour, 7-day per week access 14    to network-affiliated primary care, emergency services, 15    and women's principal health care providers.16    An insurer shall not prohibit a preferred provider from 17discussing any specific or all treatment options with 18beneficiaries irrespective of the insurer's position on those 19treatment options or from advocating on behalf of 20beneficiaries within the utilization review, grievance, or 21appeals processes established by the insurer in accordance 22with any rights or remedies available under applicable State 23or federal law.24    (b) Insurers must file for review a description of the 25services to be offered through a network plan. The description 26shall include all of the following:  HB1331 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1        (1) A geographic map of the area proposed to be served 2    by the plan by county service area and zip code, including 3    marked locations for preferred providers.4        (2) As deemed necessary by the Department, the names, 5    addresses, phone numbers, and specialties of the providers 6    who have entered into preferred provider agreements under 7    the network plan.8        (3) The number of beneficiaries anticipated to be 9    covered by the network plan.10        (4) An Internet website and toll-free telephone number 11    for beneficiaries and prospective beneficiaries to access 12    current and accurate lists of preferred providers, 13    additional information about the plan, as well as any 14    other information required by Department rule.15        (5) A description of how health care services to be 16    rendered under the network plan are reasonably accessible 17    and available to beneficiaries. The description shall 18    address all of the following:19            (A) the type of health care services to be 20        provided by the network plan;21            (B) the ratio of physicians and other providers to 22        beneficiaries, by specialty and including primary care 23        physicians and facility-based physicians when 24        applicable under the contract, necessary to meet the 25        health care needs and service demands of the currently 26        enrolled population;   HB1331 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1            (C) the travel and distance standards for plan 2        beneficiaries in county service areas; and3            (D) a description of how the use of telemedicine, 4        telehealth, or mobile care services may be used to 5        partially meet the network adequacy standards, if 6        applicable.7        (6) A provision ensuring that whenever a beneficiary 8    has made a good faith effort, as evidenced by accessing 9    the provider directory, calling the network plan, and 10    calling the provider, to utilize preferred providers for a 11    covered service and it is determined the insurer does not 12    have the appropriate preferred providers due to 13    insufficient number, type, unreasonable travel distance or 14    delay, or preferred providers refusing to provide a 15    covered service because it is contrary to the conscience 16    of the preferred providers, as protected by the Health 17    Care Right of Conscience Act, the insurer shall ensure, 18    directly or indirectly, by terms contained in the payer 19    contract, that the beneficiary will be provided the 20    covered service at no greater cost to the beneficiary than 21    if the service had been provided by a preferred provider. 22    This paragraph (6) does not apply to: (A) a beneficiary 23    who willfully chooses to access a non-preferred provider 24    for health care services available through the panel of 25    preferred providers, or (B) a beneficiary enrolled in a 26    health maintenance organization. In these circumstances,   HB1331 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    the contractual requirements for non-preferred provider 2    reimbursements shall apply unless Section 356z.3a of the 3    Illinois Insurance Code requires otherwise. In no event 4    shall a beneficiary who receives care at a participating 5    health care facility be required to search for 6    participating providers under the circumstances described 7    in subsection (b) or (b-5) of Section 356z.3a of the 8    Illinois Insurance Code except under the circumstances 9    described in paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5).10        (7) A provision that the beneficiary shall receive 11    emergency care coverage such that payment for this 12    coverage is not dependent upon whether the emergency 13    services are performed by a preferred or non-preferred 14    provider and the coverage shall be at the same benefit 15    level as if the service or treatment had been rendered by a 16    preferred provider. For purposes of this paragraph (7), 17    "the same benefit level" means that the beneficiary is 18    provided the covered service at no greater cost to the 19    beneficiary than if the service had been provided by a 20    preferred provider. This provision shall be consistent 21    with Section 356z.3a of the Illinois Insurance Code.22        (8) A limitation that, if the plan provides that the 23    beneficiary will incur a penalty for failing to 24    pre-certify inpatient hospital treatment, the penalty may 25    not exceed $1,000 per occurrence in addition to the plan 26    cost sharing provisions.  HB1331 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    (c) The network plan shall demonstrate to the Director a 2minimum ratio of providers to plan beneficiaries as required 3by the Department.4        (1) The ratio of physicians or other providers to plan 5    beneficiaries shall be established annually by the 6    Department in consultation with the Department of Public 7    Health based upon the guidance from the federal Centers 8    for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The Department shall 9    not establish ratios for vision or dental providers who 10    provide services under dental-specific or vision-specific 11    benefits. The Department shall consider establishing 12    ratios for the following physicians or other providers:13            (A) Primary Care;14            (B) Pediatrics;15            (C) Cardiology;16            (D) Gastroenterology;17            (E) General Surgery;18            (F) Neurology;19            (G) OB/GYN;20            (H) Oncology/Radiation;21            (I) Ophthalmology;22            (J) Urology;23            (K) Behavioral Health;24            (L) Allergy/Immunology;25            (M) Chiropractic;26            (N) Dermatology;  HB1331 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1            (O) Endocrinology;2            (P) Ears, Nose, and Throat (ENT)/Otolaryngology;3            (Q) Infectious Disease;4            (R) Nephrology;5            (S) Neurosurgery;6            (T) Orthopedic Surgery;7            (U) Physiatry/Rehabilitative;8            (V) Plastic Surgery;9            (W) Pulmonary;10            (X) Rheumatology;11            (Y) Anesthesiology;12            (Z) Pain Medicine;13            (AA) Pediatric Specialty Services;14            (BB) Outpatient Dialysis; and15            (CC) HIV; and .16            (DD) Genetic Medicine and Genetic Counseling. 17        (1.5) Beginning January 1, 2026, every insurer shall 18    demonstrate to the Director that each in-network hospital 19    has at least one radiologist, pathologist, 20    anesthesiologist, and emergency room physician as a 21    preferred provider in a network plan. The Department may, 22    by rule, require additional types of hospital-based 23    medical specialists to be included as preferred providers 24    in each in-network hospital in a network plan. 25        (2) The Director shall establish a process for the 26    review of the adequacy of these standards, along with an   HB1331 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    assessment of additional specialties to be included in the 2    list under this subsection (c).3    (d) The network plan shall demonstrate to the Director 4maximum travel and distance standards for plan beneficiaries, 5which shall be established annually by the Department in 6consultation with the Department of Public Health based upon 7the guidance from the federal Centers for Medicare and 8Medicaid Services. These standards shall consist of the 9maximum minutes or miles to be traveled by a plan beneficiary 10for each county type, such as large counties, metro counties, 11or rural counties as defined by Department rule.12    The maximum travel time and distance standards must 13include standards for each physician and other provider 14category listed for which ratios have been established.15    The Director shall establish a process for the review of 16the adequacy of these standards along with an assessment of 17additional specialties to be included in the list under this 18subsection (d).19    (d-5)(1) Every insurer shall ensure that beneficiaries 20have timely and proximate access to treatment for mental, 21emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions 22in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (4) of 23subsection (a) of Section 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. 24Insurers shall use a comparable process, strategy, evidentiary 25standard, and other factors in the development and application 26of the network adequacy standards for timely and proximate   HB1331 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1access to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or 2substance use disorders or conditions and those for the access 3to treatment for medical and surgical conditions. As such, the 4network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access 5shall equally be applied to treatment facilities and providers 6for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 7conditions and specialists providing medical or surgical 8benefits pursuant to the parity requirements of Section 370c.1 9of the Illinois Insurance Code and the federal Paul Wellstone 10and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity 11Act of 2008. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the network 12adequacy standards for timely and proximate access to 13treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 14disorders or conditions shall, at a minimum, satisfy the 15following requirements:16        (A) For beneficiaries residing in the metropolitan 17    counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, and Will, 18    network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access 19    to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance 20    use disorders or conditions means a beneficiary shall not 21    have to travel longer than 30 minutes or 30 miles from the 22    beneficiary's residence to receive outpatient treatment 23    for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders 24    or conditions. Beneficiaries shall not be required to wait 25    longer than 10 business days between requesting an initial 26    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of   HB1331 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 2    conditions for outpatient treatment or to wait longer than 3    20 business days between requesting a repeat or follow-up 4    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of 5    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 6    conditions for outpatient treatment; however, subject to 7    the protections of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a 8    network plan shall not be held responsible if the 9    beneficiary or provider voluntarily chooses to schedule an 10    appointment outside of these required time frames.11        (B) For beneficiaries residing in Illinois counties 12    other than those counties listed in subparagraph (A) of 13    this paragraph, network adequacy standards for timely and 14    proximate access to treatment for mental, emotional, 15    nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions means a 16    beneficiary shall not have to travel longer than 60 17    minutes or 60 miles from the beneficiary's residence to 18    receive outpatient treatment for mental, emotional, 19    nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions. 20    Beneficiaries shall not be required to wait longer than 10 21    business days between requesting an initial appointment 22    and being seen by the facility or provider of mental, 23    emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 24    conditions for outpatient treatment or to wait longer than 25    20 business days between requesting a repeat or follow-up 26    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of   HB1331 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 2    conditions for outpatient treatment; however, subject to 3    the protections of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a 4    network plan shall not be held responsible if the 5    beneficiary or provider voluntarily chooses to schedule an 6    appointment outside of these required time frames.7    (2) For beneficiaries residing in all Illinois counties, 8network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access to 9treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 10disorders or conditions means a beneficiary shall not have to 11travel longer than 60 minutes or 60 miles from the 12beneficiary's residence to receive inpatient or residential 13treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 14disorders or conditions.15    (3) If there is no in-network facility or provider 16available for a beneficiary to receive timely and proximate 17access to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or 18substance use disorders or conditions in accordance with the 19network adequacy standards outlined in this subsection, the 20insurer shall provide necessary exceptions to its network to 21ensure admission and treatment with a provider or at a 22treatment facility in accordance with the network adequacy 23standards in this subsection. 24    (e) Except for network plans solely offered as a group 25health plan, these ratio and time and distance standards apply 26to the lowest cost-sharing tier of any tiered network.  HB1331 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    (f) The network plan may consider use of other health care 2service delivery options, such as telemedicine or telehealth, 3mobile clinics, and centers of excellence, or other ways of 4delivering care to partially meet the requirements set under 5this Section.6    (g) Except for the requirements set forth in subsection 7(d-5), insurers who are not able to comply with the provider 8ratios and time and distance standards established by the 9Department may request an exception to these requirements from 10the Department. The Department may grant an exception in the 11following circumstances:12        (1) if no providers or facilities meet the specific 13    time and distance standard in a specific service area and 14    the insurer (i) discloses information on the distance and 15    travel time points that beneficiaries would have to travel 16    beyond the required criterion to reach the next closest 17    contracted provider outside of the service area and (ii) 18    provides contact information, including names, addresses, 19    and phone numbers for the next closest contracted provider 20    or facility;21        (2) if patterns of care in the service area do not 22    support the need for the requested number of provider or 23    facility type and the insurer provides data on local 24    patterns of care, such as claims data, referral patterns, 25    or local provider interviews, indicating where the 26    beneficiaries currently seek this type of care or where   HB1331 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 07370 BAB 17410 b1    the physicians currently refer beneficiaries, or both; or2        (3) other circumstances deemed appropriate by the 3    Department consistent with the requirements of this Act.4    (h) Insurers are required to report to the Director any 5material change to an approved network plan within 15 days 6after the change occurs and any change that would result in 7failure to meet the requirements of this Act. Upon notice from 8the insurer, the Director shall reevaluate the network plan's 9compliance with the network adequacy and transparency 10standards of this Act.11(Source: P.A. 102-144, eff. 1-1-22; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 12102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-906, eff. 1-1-25.)